Utah statutes.
16-16-803.   Qualifications of directors.
(1)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, and subject to Subsection
(3), each director of a limited cooperative association shall be an individual
who is a member of the association or an individual who is designated by a
member that is not an individual for purposes of qualifying and serving as a
director.  Initial directors need not be members.
(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may be an officer
or employee of the limited cooperative association.
(3)  If the organic rules provide for nonmember directors, the number of
nonmember directors may not exceed:
(a)  one, if there are two through four directors;
(b)  two, if there are five through eight directors; or
(c)  1/3 of the total number of directors if there are at least nine
directors.
(4)  The organic rules may provide qualifications for directors in addition to
those in this section.
